Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.044

Retired teacher may reenter system—Benefit limitations.

A retired teacher upon returning to service in the public schools of Washington may elect to again become a member of the retirement system: PROVIDED, That if such a retired teacher elects to be restored to membership he or she must establish two full years of service credit before he or she will be eligible to retire under the provision of a formula other than the one in effect at the time of his or her previous retirement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where any such right to again retire is exercised to become effective before a member has established two full years of service credit he or she may elect to retire only under the provisions of the formula in effect at the time of his or her previous retirement: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to any individual who has returned to service and is presently in service on *the effective date of this 1973 amendatory act.

[ 2012 c 117 s 56; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 5; 1947 c 80 s 58; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-77. Formerly RCW 41.32.580.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "the effective date of this 1973 amendatory act," because of the emergency clause footnoted to RCW 41.32.310, is September 27, 1973, the date of approval by the governor.

Emergency—Severability—1973 2nd ex.s. c 32: See notes following RCW 41.32.310.